Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 13.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8910
Veterinary drug order, defined.

Veterinary drug order means a lawful order or prescription of a veterinarian licensed to practice in this state issued pursuant to a bona fide veterinarian-client-patient relationship. For purposes of the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act, a veterinary drug order expires and becomes void one hundred eighty days after the date of issue.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 10;

Laws 2009, LB463, § 13.
August 30, 2009